Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,232
Action against employee; act or omission of employee.

Nothing in the State Tort Claims Act shall be construed to prevent the state from bringing an action for recovery from an employee of the state when the state has made payment of an award or settlement growing out of the employee's act or omission under the State Tort Claims Act.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 24, p. 2852;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 43.